Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-833
Inspection warrant; issuance; procedure.

An inspection warrant shall be issued only by a judge of a court of record upon reasonable cause, supported by affidavit describing the place and purpose of inspection. The judge may examine the applicant and other witnesses, on oath, to determine sufficient cause for inspection.

Laws 1969, c. 231, § 4, p. 859.